Utah statutes.
32A-14a-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Employee protected in exercising
judgment.
(1)  An employer may not sanction or terminate the employment of an employee
of a restaurant, airport lounge, on-premise banquet licensee, resort, club
licensee, on-premise beer retailer, or any other establishment serving an
alcoholic beverage as a result of the employee having exercised the employee's
independent judgment to refuse to sell an alcoholic beverage to a person the
employee considers to meet one or more of the conditions described in
Subsection 32A-14a-102(1).
(2) An employer who terminates an employee or imposes sanctions on the
employee contrary to this section is considered to have discriminated against
that employee and is subject to the conditions and penalties set forth in
Title 34A, Chapter 5, Utah Antidiscrimination Act.
